Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.312

Christmas tree grower license—Application. (Expires July 1, 2030.)

Application for a Christmas tree grower license shall include:

(1) The full name of the person applying for the license, whether the applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, and if the applicant is a firm or partnership the full name of each member of the firm or partnership, and if the applicant is an association or corporation the names of the officers of the association or corporation;

(2) The principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere;

(3) The address and acreage of Christmas trees for each location included in the application;

(4) The names of the persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant; and

(5) Any other information prescribed by the director.

[ 2007 c 335 s 6.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.